Washington statutes.
RCW 43.386.090

Exemption—Federal regulations and orders—Airports and seaports.

(1) This chapter does not apply to a state or local government agency that: (a) Is mandated to use a specific facial recognition service pursuant to a federal regulation or order, or that are undertaken through partnership with a federal agency to fulfill a congressional mandate; or (b) uses a facial recognition service in association with a federal agency to verify the identity of individuals presenting themselves for travel at an airport or seaport.

(2) A state or local government agency must report to a legislative authority the use of a facial recognition service pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2020 c 257 s 9.]